Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202680-418
Women Veterans Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Women Veterans Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Veterans' Affairs. The fund shall consist of money credited pursuant to section 60-3,163.02. The fund may be used by the department for events that focus on women veterans. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 76.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.